ubuntu.slaves.black/1/packages/xuxen-eu-spell/src/myspell/eu-ES.aff
SFX a Y 748
SFX a  rtu      r          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rraraz          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rrarazi          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rrarazte          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rraraztear          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rrarazteke          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rrarazten          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtua          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuago          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuak          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuarekin          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuarekiko          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuarendako          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuarentzat          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuarentzako          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuaren          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuarena          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuarenak          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuarenarekin          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuarenarendako          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuarenarentzat          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuarenari          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuarenaz          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuarenei          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuarenek          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuarenekin          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuarenendako          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuarenentzat          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuarenetaraino          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuarenetarantz          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuarenetarat          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuarenetara          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuarenetatik          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuarenetan          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuarenetarik          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuarenez          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuarengan          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuarengana          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuarenganaino          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuarenganantz          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuarengandik          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuarengatik          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuarenoi          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuarenok          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuarenokin          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuarenontzat          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuarenotaz          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuarenoz          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuareni          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuarenik          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuarenean          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuareneraino          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuarenerantz          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuarenerat          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuarenera          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuarenetik          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuari          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuaz          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuagan          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuagana          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuaganaino          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuaganantz          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuagandik          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuagatik          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuegi          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuegia          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuegiak          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuegiarekin          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuegiarendako          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuegiarentzat          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuegiaren          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuegiari          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuegiaz          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuegiei          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuegiek          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuegiekin          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuegiendako          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuegientzat          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuegietako          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuegietaraino          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuegietarantz          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuegietarat          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuegietara          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuegietatik          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuegietan          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuegietarik          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuegiez          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuegien          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuegigatik          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuegioi          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuegiok          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuegiokin          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuegiontzat          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuegiotaz          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuegioz          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuegion          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuegitzat          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuegik          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuegitako          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuegitaraino          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuegitarantz          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuegitarat          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuegitara          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuegitatik          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuegitan          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuegitarik          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuegiz          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuegirekin          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuegirendako          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuegirentzat          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuegiren          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuegiri          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuegirik          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuegian          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuegiko          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuegiraino          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuegirantz          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuegirat          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuegira          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuegitik          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuei          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuek          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuekin          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuekiko          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuen          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuendako          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuentzat          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuentzako          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuena          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuenak          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuenarekin          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuenarendako          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuenarentzat          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuenaren          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuenari          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuenaz          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuenei          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuenek          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuenekin          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuenendako          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuenentzat          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuenetako          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuenetaraino          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuenetarantz          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuenetarat          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuenetara          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuenetatik          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuenetan          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuenetarik          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuenez          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuenen          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuengatik          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuenoi          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuenok          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuenokin          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuenontzat          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuenotaz          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuenoz          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuenon          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtueni          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuenik          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuenean          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtueneko          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtueneraino          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuenerantz          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuenerat          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuenera          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuenetik          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuetako          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuetaraino          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuetarantz          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuetarat          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuetara          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuetatik          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuetan          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuetarik          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuez          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuengan          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuengana          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuenganaino          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuenganantz          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuengandik          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtugatik          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtugatiko          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtukeran          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuko          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuoi          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuok          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuokin          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuokiko          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuontzat          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuontzako          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuotaz          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuotako          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuotaraino          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuotarantz          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuotarat          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuotara          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuotatik          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuotan          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuotarik          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuoz          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuon          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuona          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuonak          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuonarekin          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuonarendako          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuonarentzat          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuonari          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuonaz          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuonei          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuonek          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuonekin          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuonendako          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuonentzat          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuonez          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuongan          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuongana          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuonganaino          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuonganantz          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuongandik          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuongatik          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuonoi          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuonok          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuonokin          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuonontzat          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuonotaz          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuonoz          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuoni          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuonik          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuonean          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuoneraino          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuonerantz          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuonerat          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuonera          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuonetik          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtuta          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutako          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutxo          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutxoa          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutxoago          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutxoak          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutxoarekin          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutxoarendako          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutxoarentzat          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutxoaren          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutxoari          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutxoaz          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutxoegi          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutxoei          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutxoek          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutxoekin          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutxoen          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutxoendako          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutxoentzat          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutxoez          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutxogatik          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutxooi          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutxook          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutxookin          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutxoontzat          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutxootaz          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutxooz          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutxoon          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutxotzat          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutxok          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutxoz          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutxorekin          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutxorendako          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutxorentzat          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutxoren          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutxori          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutxorik          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutxoan          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutxoko          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutxoraino          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutxorantz          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutxorat          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutxora          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutxotik          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutzat          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutzar          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutzarra          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutzarrago          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutzarrak          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutzarrarekin          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutzarrarendako          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutzarrarentzat          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutzarraren          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutzarrari          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutzarraz          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutzarregi          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutzarrei          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutzarrek          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutzarrekin          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutzarren          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutzarrendako          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutzarrentzat          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutzarrez          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutzarroi          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutzarrok          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutzarrokin          rtu
SFX a  rtu      rtutzarrontzat          rtu
